Alaska statutes. Title 44. State Government.
Chapter 81. Commercial Fishing and Agriculture Bank.
Sec. 44.81.260.
Confidentiality of records.

The records of the bank that are identified with, or identifiable as being derived from the records of, a specific borrower, member of the bank, or applicant for a loan are confidential and may not be disclosed by the bank or by its directors, officers, employees, or agents to a person other than the directors, officers, employees, or agents of the bank, except

when required by a federal or state statute;

under AS

44.81.270

and

44.81.275

;

under a search warrant issued under federal law or the law of this state;

under a subpoena or court order issued in a civil action under federal law or the law of this state;

under a subpoena or court order issued in connection with a proceeding before a federal grand jury or grand jury of this state;

under a summons or subpoena issued by an agency or a department of the United States or this state, or an officer, employee, or agent of the agency or department;

under a request by a financial institution, if the request is solely for the stated written purpose of determining the creditworthiness of a member or borrower as an applicant for credit, and if the information disclosed by the bank pertains only to the payment history of the member or borrower;

under a request by a lender that has extended or is considering extending credit to the bank if the credit is or may be secured by the pledge of a loan by the bank;

when disclosed to the attorney general of the United States or to a law enforcement agency of this state if the records may be relevant to a report or investigation of a possible violation of federal law or a law of this state.

The records of the bank that are not subject to (a) of this section may be kept confidential by the bank, subject to the exceptions listed in (a)(1) — (5) of this section.

Notwithstanding (a) — (b) of this section, a borrower, a member of the bank, or an applicant for a loan may authorize the bank in writing to disclose records provided to the bank by the borrower, member, or applicant.

Notwithstanding (a) and (b) of this section, the bank may provide a list of the members of the bank who are eligible to serve as a director of the bank to members of the bank who are eligible to vote for directors of the bank.

In this section,

“member” includes past and present members;

“records” means financial and other records, including information known to have been derived from the records, in any form, including original documents and copies.

History.

(§ 8 ch 109 SLA 1981; am § 1 ch 15 SLA 1991; am §§ 7, 8 ch 112 SLA 2014)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (d) was enacted as (e); relettered in 2014, at which time former subsection (d) was relettered as (e).

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective August 5, 2014, in (a), in (a)(2), added “and 44.81.275”, and made a stylistic change; added (e) [now (d)].

Sec. 44.81.270.
Audits and examinations of bank.

The legislative auditor may cause the bank to be audited in the manner and under the conditions established by AS

24.20.271

for audits performed by the legislative audit division. The legislative audit division has free access to all books and papers of the bank that relate to the business of the bank and books and papers kept by a director, officer, or employee relating to or upon which a record of the business of the bank is kept. The legislative audit division may summon witnesses and administer oaths or affirmations in the examination of directors, officers, or employees of the bank or another person in relation to the affairs, transactions, and conditions of the bank, and may require and compel the production of records, books, papers, contracts, or other documents by court order if not voluntarily produced. At the direction of the Legislative Budget and Audit Committee under AS

24.20.271

, the legislative auditor may conduct an audit of the bank.

The legislative auditor and the auditor’s employees may not disclose information acquired by them in the course of an audit of the bank concerning the particulars of the business or affairs of a borrower of the bank or another person, unless the information is required to be disclosed by law or under a court order.

The bank shall be audited annually by independent outside auditors. The legislative auditor may confer with the outside auditors and review the work papers of the audit. The board shall engage the outside auditors, who shall be responsible to the board. The bank shall submit copies of each report of the outside auditors to the legislative auditor within 30 days of the report by the bank.

[Repealed, § 2 ch 27 SLA 2003.]

History.

(§ 8 ch 109 SLA 1981; am § 7 ch 49 SLA 1987; am §§ 40, 41 ch 85 SLA 1988; am § 23 ch 34 SLA 1996; am § 2 ch 27 SLA 2003)

Administrative Code. —

For powers of the department, see 3 AAC 1, art. 1.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 28, ch. 34, SLA 1996 provides that the 1996 amendments made by that chapter to this section do not affect “a contract, cause of action, liability, penalty, or proceeding existing, incurred, or accrued on August 20, 1996,” and do not affect “an action of the Alaska Commercial Fishing and Agriculture Bank taken before August 20, 1996.”

Sec. 44.81.275.
Examinations.

At intervals that are not greater than 36 months, an examiner from the department shall perform an examination of the bank. Each interval shall be determined by the commissioner. During the examination, the examiner shall evaluate the quality of the bank’s loan portfolio on a statistical basis and on the appropriateness and effectiveness of the bank’s policies, practices, and management to carry out the bank’s statutory purposes.

The examiner shall prepare a summary report of the examiner’s findings and conclusions. The department shall distribute a copy of the report to the bank and to the legislative auditor, but the records, information, and findings of the department related to the examination are otherwise confidential under AS

06.01.025

.

The commissioner shall assess the bank a fee for the actual expenses necessarily incurred by the department in connection with an examination performed under this section. The fee must include the proportionate part of the salaries and cost of employee benefits of the examiners while conducting the examination and while preparing the summary report required by (b) of this section and the transportation costs and per diem of each examiner while away from the examiner’s duty station. The fee may not exceed the actual cost to the department for the examination. The commissioner shall assess the fee as soon as feasible after the examination has been completed. The bank shall pay the assessment within 30 days after receiving the commissioner’s notice of the assessment.

In this section,

“commissioner” means the commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development;

“department” means the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development.

History.

(§ 9 ch 112 SLA 2014)

Cross references. —

For provision limiting the conduct of examinations under this section, see sec. 11, ch. 112, SLA 2014.

Effective dates. —

Section 12, ch. 112, SLA 2014 makes this section effective August 5, 2014, in accordance with AS

01.10.070(c)

.

Sec. 44.81.280.
Prohibition on disclosure. [Repealed, § 27 ch 34 SLA 1996.]

Sec. 44.81.300.
Unclaimed distributions, redemptions, or payments.

The bank may revoke a distribution of net proceeds by the bank or a redemption of or payment based upon an allocation of proceeds or upon capital stock issued by the bank if the distribution, redemption, or payment remains unclaimed six years after the date authorized for payment, redemption, or retirement. The amount revoked may revert to an unallocated capital account of the bank if, at least six months before the declared date of revocation, the bank has mailed to the last known address of the person shown by the bank’s records to be entitled to the amount a notice that the payment is available to the person; if the address is unknown, the bank shall publish the notice as provided by law for the publication of a summons. A distribution, redemption, or payment subject to this section is not subject to AS

34.45.110

—

34.45.780

.

History.

(§ 24 ch 34 SLA 1996)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 28, ch. 34, SLA 1996 provides that the 1996 amendments made by that chapter that added this section do not affect “a contract, cause of action, liability, penalty, or proceeding existing, incurred, or accrued on August 20, 1996,” and do not affect “an action of the Alaska Commercial Fishing and Agriculture Bank taken before August 20, 1996.”

Sec. 44.81.350.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“bank” means the Alaska Commercial Fishing and Agriculture Bank;

“commercial agriculture” includes commercially related activity in connection with producing, harvesting, processing, or marketing an agricultural, maricultural, or horticultural commodity, including the breeding, raising, shearing, feeding, caring for, training, and management of livestock, bees, poultry, shellfish, and fur-bearing animals and wildlife, and the planting, cultivating, caring for, harvesting, or processing of forest products on a sustained yield basis;

“commission” means the Alaska Commercial Fisheries Entry Commission under AS

16.43.020

;

“member of the bank” includes

a holder of a share of membership stock of the bank; or

a patron of the bank with retained patronage earnings, or other form of capital ownership in the bank, of $2,500 or more to the patron’s credit;

“natural resources” includes water, coal or other minerals, oil or gas, and geothermal systems; in this paragraph,

“coal” means all forms of coal, including lignite;

“gas” includes all natural gas and all hydrocarbons produced at the wellhead that are not oil;

“geothermal system” means a stratum, pool, reservoir, or other geologic formation containing geothermal resources;

“oil” includes crude petroleum oil and other hydrocarbons regardless of gravity that are produced at the wellhead in liquid form and the liquid hydrocarbons known as distillate or condensate recovered or extracted from gas, other than gas produced in association with oil and commonly known as casinghead gas;

“other minerals” means clay, stone, sand, gravel, metalliferous and non-metalliferous ores, and other solid materials or substances of commercial value excavated in solid form from natural deposits on or in the earth; “other minerals” does not include coal or minerals that occur naturally in liquid or gaseous forms;

“permit” means a limited entry permit issued under AS 16.43;

“resident farmer” means a person who is a resident of the state and who is engaged in commercial agriculture in the state;

“resident fisher” means a person who is a resident of the state and who is engaged in commercial fishing in the state;

“supplier” means a person whose main source of income is from providing goods or services that are directly related to commercial fishing or agriculture to individuals, corporations, partnerships, or joint ventures engaged in commercial fishing or agriculture;

“tourism” means the provision or presentation of goods, supplies, equipment, food and food stuffs, accommodations, entertainment, cultural practices and attractions, natural resource access, or transportation for Alaska tourists;

“water” has the meaning given in AS

46.15.260

.

History.

(§ 18 ch 51 SLA 1980; am §§ 25, 26 ch 34 SLA 1996; am § 3 ch 102 SLA 2000)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.54.260. Renumbered in 1980.

Reorganized in 1996 and 2000.